Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.010

Order for examination of judgment debtor—Plaintiff entitled to costs—Additional fees if debtor fails to answer or appear—When warrants permitted.

(1) At any time within ten years after entry of a judgment for the sum of twenty-five dollars or over, unless the time is extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3), upon application by the judgment creditor such court or judge may, by an order, require the judgment debtor to appear at a specified time and place before the judge granting the order, or a referee appointed by the judge, to answer concerning the same.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the judge to whom application is made under this chapter may, if it is made to appear to him or her by the affidavit of the judgment creditor, his or her agent or attorney that there is danger of the debtor absconding, order the sheriff to arrest the debtor and bring him or her before the judge granting the order. Upon being brought before the judge, he or she may be ordered to enter into a bond, with sufficient sureties, that he or she will attend from time to time before the judge or referee, as shall be directed, during the pendency of the proceedings and until the final termination thereof.

(3) If the judgment debtor or other persons against whom the special proceedings are instituted has been served with these proceedings, the plaintiff shall be entitled to costs of service, notary fees, and an appearance fee of twenty-five dollars. If the judgment debtor or other persons fail to answer or appear, the plaintiff shall additionally be entitled to reasonable attorney fees. If a plaintiff institutes special proceedings and fails to appear, a judgment debtor or other person against whom the proceeding was instituted who appears is entitled to an appearance fee of twenty-five dollars and reasonable attorney fees.

(4) A plaintiff may not seek a warrant for the arrest of a judgment debtor for any act or failure to act that arises out of or relates to a judgment for medical debt, unless the act or failure to act constitutes a crime under state law.

[ 2019 c 227 s 2; 1994 c 189 s 4; 1985 c 215 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 6; 1980 c 105 s 5; 1971 ex.s. c 211 s 1; 1957 c 8 s 7; 1899 c 93 s 1; 1893 c 133 s 1; RRS s 613.]

NOTES:

Application—1980 c 105: See note following RCW 4.16.020.